Georgia, session 2025_26, HB478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 2 of Article 15 of Chapter 1 of Title 10 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to the Fair Business Practices Act, is amended in Code Section 10-1-392, relating
to definitions, by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(.1) 'AI generated content' means a video recording, video file, audio recording, audio
file, still image, or still image file that is created through the use of an engineered or
machine based system that emulates the capability of a person to receive audio, visual,
text, or any other form of information and use the information received to emulate a
human cognitive process, including, but not limited to, learning, generalizing, reasoning,
H. B. 478
- 1 -

LC 59 0111
planning, predicting, acting, or communicating; provided, however, that artificial
intelligence systems may vary in the forms of information they can receive and in the
human cognitive processes they can emulate."
SECTION 2.
Said part is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"10-1-393.20.
(a) On or after July 1, 2025, any individual engaged in the dissemination of AI generated
content to facilitate commerce or trade shall ensure such content includes a disclosure that
artificial intelligence was used to make all or part of such content.
(b) Disclosures required under subsection (a) of this Code section for AI generated content
that involves the use, in whole or in part, of visual media shall be:
(1) In writing and completed in each written language used in such content; and
(2) Clearly readable, which shall mean that the text of the disclosure shall:
(A) Appear in letters equal to or greater than 30 percent of the vertical picture height;
(B) Be visible for a period of at least 30 percent of the media's length, in the case of
moving images and video; and
(C) Appear with a reasonable degree of color contrast between the background and the
text of the statement. A statement satisfies the color contrast requirement of this
subparagraph if it is printed in black text on a white background or if the degree of
color contrast between the background and the text of the statement is no less than the
color contrast between the background and the largest type size used in the content.
(c) Disclosures required under subsection (a) of this Code section for AI generated content
that involves the use, in whole or in part, of audible media shall be announced, articulated,
spoken, or otherwise rendered completely using the same audible volume, the same rate
of speaking as measured in words per minute, and each spoken language as used in such
content.
H. B. 478
- 2 -

LC 59 0111
(d) It shall be unlawful to omit disclosures required under subsection (a) of this Code
section.
(e) Each video recording, video file, audio recording, audio file, still image, or still image
file disseminated in facilitating commerce or trade that omits disclosures required under
subsection (a) of this Code section shall constitute a separate violation."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 478
- 3 -